Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Concussion Awareness Act:

(1) Chief medical officer
means the chief medical officer as designated in section 81-3115; and

(2) Licensed health care
professional means a physician or licensed practitioner under the direct supervision
of a physician, a certified athletic trainer, a neuropsychologist, or some
other qualified individual who (a) is registered, licensed, certified, or
otherwise statutorily recognized by the State of Nebraska to provide health
care services and (b) is trained in the evaluation and management of traumatic
brain injuries among a pediatric population.

Laws 2011, LB260, § 3.